Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.530

Grower may file form showing crops processor is committed to purchase.

Any grower may file with the director on a form prescribed by him or her the acres of crops and/or quantity of crops to be harvested during the present or next growing season, which he or she understands a processor has orally committed himself or herself to purchase.

[ 2011 c 336 s 591; 1971 ex.s. c 182 s 18.]